Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.535

Attempted transfer of property by individual subject to conservatorship.

(1) The interest of an individual subject to conservatorship in property included in the conservatorship estate is not transferable or assignable by the individual and is not subject to levy, garnishment, or similar process for claims against the individual unless allowed under RCW 11.130.555.

(2) If an individual subject to conservatorship enters into a contract after having the right to enter the contract removed by the court, the contract is void against the individual and the individual's property but is enforceable against the person that contracted with the individual.

(3) A person other than the conservator that deals with an individual subject to conservatorship with respect to property included in the conservatorship estate is entitled to protection provided by law of this state other than this chapter.

[ 2019 c 437 s 424.]